Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325E.91] PROHIBITION ON NUDIFICATION TECHNOLOGY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Intimate part" has the meaning given in section 604.32, subdivision 1, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (c) "Nudify" means the process by which: new text end new text begin (1) an image or video is altered to reveal an intimate part not depicted in the original unaltered image or video; or new text end new text begin (2) the depiction is so realistic that a reasonable person would believe the depiction reveals an intimate part of an identifiable individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Nudification prohibited. new text end new text begin A person who owns or controls a website, application, software, or program must not allow a user to access, download, or use the website to nudify an image or video. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Civil action; damages. new text end new text begin An individual injured by a violation of this section may bring an action for: new text end new text begin (1) compensatory damages, including mental anguish or suffering, in an amount up to three times the actual damages sustained; new text end new text begin (2) punitive damages; new text end new text begin (3) injunctive relief; new text end new text begin (4) reasonable attorney fees, costs, and disbursements; and new text end new text begin (5) other relief the court deems just and equitable. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin The attorney general may enforce this section under section 8.31. In addition to other remedies or penalties, a person that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $500,000 for each unlawful access, download, or use under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end